third_party/hunspell_dictionaries/fo_FO/fo_FO.aff
FLAG num
#arvorð
SFX 102 N 11
SFX 102 0 orð .
SFX 102 0 orða .
SFX 102 0 orðanna .
SFX 102 0 orði .
SFX 102 0 orðið .
SFX 102 0 orðini .
SFX 102 0 orðinum .
SFX 102 0 orðs .
SFX 102 0 orðsins .
SFX 102 0 orðum .
SFX 102 0 orðunum .

#akslatræ
SFX 103 N 12
SFX 103 0 træ .
SFX 103 0 træa .
SFX 103 0 træanna .
SFX 103 0 træi .
SFX 103 0 træið .
SFX 103 0 trænum .
SFX 103 0 træs .
SFX 103 0 træsins .
SFX 103 0 trø .
SFX 103 0 trøini .
SFX 103 0 trøum .
SFX 103 0 trøunum .

#arvavaksin
SFX 104 N 8
SFX 104 0 vaksið .
SFX 104 0 vaksin .
SFX 104 0 vaksna .
SFX 104 0 vaksnan .
SFX 104 0 vaksnar .
SFX 104 0 vaksnari .
SFX 104 0 vaksnir .
SFX 104 0 vaksnum .

#arbeiðsførur
SFX 105 N 9
SFX 105 0 før .
SFX 105 0 føra .
SFX 105 0 føran .
SFX 105 0 førar .
SFX 105 0 førari .
SFX 105 0 førir .
SFX 105 0 ført .
SFX 105 0 førum .
SFX 105 0 førur .

#arbeiðsnevnd
SFX 106 N 12
SFX 106 0 nevnd .
SFX 106 0 nevnda .
SFX 106 0 nevndanna .
SFX 106 0 nevndar .
SFX 106 0 nevndarinnar .
SFX 106 0 nevndin .
SFX 106 0 nevndina .
SFX 106 0 nevndini .
SFX 106 0 nevndir .
SFX 106 0 nevndirnar .
SFX 106 0 nevndum .
SFX 106 0 nevndunum .

#aðalfundur
SFX 107 N 15
SFX 107 0 fund .
SFX 107 0 funda .
SFX 107 0 fundanna .
SFX 107 0 fundar .
SFX 107 0 fundarins .
SFX 107 0 fundi .
SFX 107 0 fundin .
SFX 107 0 fundinum .
SFX 107 0 fundir .
SFX 107 0 fundirnar .
SFX 107 0 fundirnir .
SFX 107 0 fundum .
SFX 107 0 fundunum .
SFX 107 0 fundur .
SFX 107 0 fundurin .

#almannakunngera
SFX 108 N 4
SFX 108 d di .
SFX 108 d du .
SFX 108 d t .
SFX 108 0 ur .

#aloyða
SFX 109 N 3
SFX 109 d di .
SFX 109 d du .
SFX 109 0 ur .

#akurhoylús
SFX 110 N 9
SFX 110 0 a .
SFX 110 0 anna .
SFX 110 0 ar .
SFX 110 0 arinnar .
SFX 110 0 in .
SFX 110 0 ina .
SFX 110 0 ini .
SFX 110 0 um .
SFX 110 0 unum .

#avlatingararbeiði
SFX 111 N 11
SFX 111 0 arbeiða .
SFX 111 0 arbeiðanna .
SFX 111 0 arbeiði .
SFX 111 0 arbeiðið .
SFX 111 0 arbeiðini .
SFX 111 0 arbeiðinum .
SFX 111 0 arbeiðir .
SFX 111 0 arbeiðis .
SFX 111 0 arbeiðisins .
SFX 111 0 arbeiðum .
SFX 111 0 arbeiðunum .

#aldukendur
SFX 112 N 9
SFX 112 0 kend .
SFX 112 0 kenda .
SFX 112 0 kendan .
SFX 112 0 kendar .
SFX 112 0 kendari .
SFX 112 0 kendir .
SFX 112 0 kendum .
SFX 112 0 kendur .
SFX 112 0 kent .

#afturbein
SFX 113 N 11
SFX 113 0 bein .
SFX 113 0 beina .
SFX 113 0 beinanna .
SFX 113 0 beini .
SFX 113 0 beinið .
SFX 113 0 beinini .
SFX 113 0 beininum .
SFX 113 0 beins .
SFX 113 0 beinsins .
SFX 113 0 beinum .
SFX 113 0 beinunum .

#andlitsmynd
SFX 114 N 12
SFX 114 0 mynd .
SFX 114 0 mynda .
SFX 114 0 myndanna .
SFX 114 0 myndar .
SFX 114 0 myndarinnar .
SFX 114 0 myndin .
SFX 114 0 myndina .
SFX 114 0 myndini .
SFX 114 0 myndir .
SFX 114 0 myndirnar .
SFX 114 0 myndum .
SFX 114 0 myndunum .

#argjamunnur
SFX 115 N 14
SFX 115 n s .
SFX 115 n sins .
SFX 115 0 a .
SFX 115 0 anna .
SFX 115 0 ar .
SFX 115 0 arnar .
SFX 115 0 arnir .
SFX 115 0 i .
SFX 115 0 in .
SFX 115 0 inum .
SFX 115 0 um .
SFX 115 0 unum .
SFX 115 0 ur .
SFX 115 0 urin .

#alsamur
SFX 116 N 9
SFX 116 0 sama .
SFX 116 0 saman .
SFX 116 0 samar .
SFX 116 0 samari .
SFX 116 0 samir .
SFX 116 0 samt .
SFX 116 0 samur .
SFX 116 0 som .
SFX 116 0 somum .

#arvaeginleiki
SFX 117 N 12
SFX 117 0 leika .
SFX 117 0 leikan .
SFX 117 0 leikanna .
SFX 117 0 leikans .
SFX 117 0 leikanum .
SFX 117 0 leikar .
SFX 117 0 leikarnar .
SFX 117 0 leikarnir .
SFX 117 0 leiki .
SFX 117 0 leikin .
SFX 117 0 leikum .
SFX 117 0 leikunum .

#aftursnúður
SFX 118 N 2
SFX 118 0 i .
SFX 118 0 inum .

#ansalótir
SFX 119 N 6
SFX 119 0 a .
SFX 119 0 anna .
SFX 119 0 ir .
SFX 119 0 irnar .
SFX 119 0 um .
SFX 119 0 unum .

#almáttur
SFX 120 N 7
SFX 120 0 ar .
SFX 120 0 arins .
SFX 120 0 i .
SFX 120 0 in .
SFX 120 0 inum .
SFX 120 0 ur .
SFX 120 0 urin .

#arbeiðsbuksur
SFX 121 N 6
SFX 121 0 a .
SFX 121 0 anna .
SFX 121 0 um .
SFX 121 0 unum .
SFX 121 0 ur .
SFX 121 0 urnar .

#barnfaðir
SFX 122 N 7
SFX 122 0 a .
SFX 122 0 anna .
SFX 122 0 ar .
SFX 122 0 arnar .
SFX 122 0 arnir .
SFX 122 0 um .
SFX 122 0 unum .

#akferð
SFX 123 N 12
SFX 123 0 ferð .
SFX 123 0 ferða .
SFX 123 0 ferðanna .
SFX 123 0 ferðar .
SFX 123 0 ferðarinnar .
SFX 123 0 ferðin .
SFX 123 0 ferðina .
SFX 123 0 ferðini .
SFX 123 0 ferðir .
SFX 123 0 ferðirnar .
SFX 123 0 ferðum .
SFX 123 0 ferðunum .

#aldubrot
SFX 124 N 11
SFX 124 0 brot .
SFX 124 0 brota .
SFX 124 0 brotanna .
SFX 124 0 broti .
SFX 124 0 brotið .
SFX 124 0 brotini .
SFX 124 0 brotinum .
SFX 124 0 brots .
SFX 124 0 brotsins .
SFX 124 0 brotum .
SFX 124 0 brotunum .

#angavatn
SFX 125 N 6
SFX 125 0 vatn .
SFX 125 0 vatni .
SFX 125 0 vatnið .
SFX 125 0 vatninum .
SFX 125 0 vatns .
SFX 125 0 vatnsins .

#barnadeild
SFX 126 N 12
SFX 126 0 deild .
SFX 126 0 deilda .
SFX 126 0 deildanna .
SFX 126 0 deildar .
SFX 126 0 deildarinnar .
SFX 126 0 deildin .
SFX 126 0 deildina .
SFX 126 0 deildini .
SFX 126 0 deildir .
SFX 126 0 deildirnar .
SFX 126 0 deildum .
SFX 126 0 deildunum .

#arbeiðslíkindi
SFX 127 N 7
SFX 127 0 inda .
SFX 127 0 indanna .
SFX 127 0 indi .
SFX 127 0 indini .
SFX 127 0 indir .
SFX 127 0 indum .
SFX 127 0 indunum .

#alidýr
SFX 128 N 11
SFX 128 0 dýr .
SFX 128 0 dýra .
SFX 128 0 dýranna .
SFX 128 0 dýri .
SFX 128 0 dýrið .
SFX 128 0 dýrini .
SFX 128 0 dýrinum .
SFX 128 0 dýrs .
SFX 128 0 dýrsins .
SFX 128 0 dýrum .
SFX 128 0 dýrunum .

#aftanlestur
SFX 129 N 10
SFX 129 0 a .
SFX 129 0 anna .
SFX 129 0 ar .
SFX 129 0 arins .
SFX 129 0 arnar .
SFX 129 0 arnir .
SFX 129 0 i .
SFX 129 0 inum .
SFX 129 0 um .
SFX 129 0 unum .

#árfesta
SFX 130 N 6
SFX 130 t t .
SFX 130 t ti .
SFX 130 t tu .
SFX 130 0 a .
SFX 130 0 ir .
SFX 130 0 ur .

#argjaseyður
SFX 131 N 15
SFX 131 0 seyð .
SFX 131 0 seyða .
SFX 131 0 seyðanna .
SFX 131 0 seyðar .
SFX 131 0 seyðarins .
SFX 131 0 seyði .
SFX 131 0 seyðin .
SFX 131 0 seyðinum .
SFX 131 0 seyðir .
SFX 131 0 seyðirnar .
SFX 131 0 seyðirnir .
SFX 131 0 seyðum .
SFX 131 0 seyðunum .
SFX 131 0 seyður .
SFX 131 0 seyðurin .

#afturlatingartíð
SFX 132 N 12
SFX 132 0 tíð .
SFX 132 0 tíða .
SFX 132 0 tíðanna .
SFX 132 0 tíðar .
SFX 132 0 tíðarinnar .
SFX 132 0 tíðin .
SFX 132 0 tíðina .
SFX 132 0 tíðini .
SFX 132 0 tíðir .
SFX 132 0 tíðirnar .
SFX 132 0 tíðum .
SFX 132 0 tíðunum .

#aðalevni
SFX 133 N 11
SFX 133 0 evna .
SFX 133 0 evnanna .
SFX 133 0 evni .
SFX 133 0 evnið .
SFX 133 0 evnini .
SFX 133 0 evninum .
SFX 133 0 evnir .
SFX 133 0 evnis .
SFX 133 0 evnisins .
SFX 133 0 evnum .
SFX 133 0 evnunum .

#afturhógvur
SFX 134 N 2
SFX 134 0 s .
SFX 134 0 sins .

#aldur
SFX 135 N 9
SFX 135 0 a .
SFX 135 0 anna .
SFX 135 0 ar .
SFX 135 0 arnar .
SFX 135 0 arnir .
SFX 135 0 i .
SFX 135 0 inum .
SFX 135 0 um .
SFX 135 0 unum .

#aðalkonsul
SFX 136 N 13
SFX 136 0 la .
SFX 136 0 lanna .
SFX 136 0 lar .
SFX 136 0 larnar .
SFX 136 0 larnir .
SFX 136 0 li .
SFX 136 0 linum .
SFX 136 0 lum .
SFX 136 0 lunum .
SFX 136 0 ul .
SFX 136 0 ulin .
SFX 136 0 uls .
SFX 136 0 ulsins .

#atgongumerki
SFX 137 N 11
SFX 137 0 merki .
SFX 137 0 merkið .
SFX 137 0 merkini .
SFX 137 0 merkinum .
SFX 137 0 merkir .
SFX 137 0 merkis .
SFX 137 0 merkisins .
SFX 137 0 merkja .
SFX 137 0 merkjanna .
SFX 137 0 merkjum .
SFX 137 0 merkjunum .

#almannakunnigur
SFX 138 N 9
SFX 138 0 ig .
SFX 138 0 iga .
SFX 138 0 igan .
SFX 138 0 igar .
SFX 138 0 igari .
SFX 138 0 igir .
SFX 138 0 igt .
SFX 138 0 igum .
SFX 138 0 igur .

#alisfrøði
SFX 139 N 5
SFX 139 0 frøði .
SFX 139 0 frøðin .
SFX 139 0 frøðina .
SFX 139 0 frøðini .
SFX 139 0 frøðinnar .

#aldutoppur
SFX 140 N 14
SFX 140 p s .
SFX 140 p sins .
SFX 140 0 a .
SFX 140 0 anna .
SFX 140 0 ar .
SFX 140 0 arnar .
SFX 140 0 arnir .
SFX 140 0 i .
SFX 140 0 in .
SFX 140 0 inum .
SFX 140 0 um .
SFX 140 0 unum .
SFX 140 0 ur .
SFX 140 0 urin .

#artargóður
SFX 141 N 9
SFX 141 0 góð .
SFX 141 0 góða .
SFX 141 0 góðan .
SFX 141 0 góðar .
SFX 141 0 góðari .
SFX 141 0 góðir .
SFX 141 0 góðum .
SFX 141 0 góður .
SFX 141 0 gott .
