third_party/hunspell_dictionaries/fo_FO/fo_FO.dic
brokkmanslestr/1,129
bú/1,62,215,92,51,139,204,105,81,61,65,86,172,320,229,20,137,230,167,176,258,324,240,225,173,152,222,70,182,249,186
bummpeng/1,122
dags/1,111,123,202,333,201,417,72,70,90
drekki/1,125
dura/1,311,85,103
dýnu/1,124
erva/1,282,425,153,219,49,131,363
eyrheyg/1,134
fest/130,11,7
fingursnipp/140
fiskigáv/1,121
fiskilík/1,127
fjalla/1,123,81,214,245,341,425,153,185,172,131,363,445
fleirtals/1,405,102
flog/1,93,77,262,205,168,434,238,123,92,397,342,112,202,195,20,307,385,85,142,56,126,270,320,45,323,146
fólkaminnis/1,139,204
fong/207,226,116,136,27
forsetaval/133,10
fortald/1,108
fóta/1,77,415,238,215,296,141,31,36,157,312,313,427,103,382,125
fransós/1,119
frosk/128,20,7
gæv/1,19,138
gandakunstr/1,118
gin/1,6,116,187,193
glóð/110,159
grann/8,6,6,214,4,86,333,394,103,104,211
grát/112,322,263,27,22
grindablástr/1,129
grindablóstr/1,135
gull/476,205,434,266,92,206,250,112,137,364,305,188,447,190,384,316,362
gyrðis/1,128,103
háárs/1,132
hala/1,113,296,181,377,401,36,223,188,272
hald/10,133,51,304,141,16,131
heiðurs/1,168,38,351,36,257,201,20,45,137,49,102,307,100
her/437,282,253,254,434,274,126,123,197,51,139,143,309,180,192,12,20,137,161,314,258,324,95,189,152,142,146,432,97,147,90,160,270,300,186
herleidd/1,109
hernaðarmyndug/1,117
himmal/489,168,141,125
hindberjarunn/115
hondbólts/1,126,107,325,154,106,323
hóreig/1,134
hoy/87,93,284,38,271,51,81,61,86,201,391,287,131,157,70,125
hoyberagreyt/120
húðflongd/1,108
hugfest/1,130
hugsavningar/1,105
hvíldar/1,170,38,123,50,36,79,173,305
hygg/1,422,127
illubirtl/1,122
innan/1,322,358,20,114,349,72,346
iva/1,112,31,36,79,20,45,49,116,187,193,317,100,363
jagl/1,6,128
jarn/1,62,124,284,112,377,428,95,364,362,165,190,90,160,459
kaffikopp/140
kakk/1,136
kavabrill/1,121
kleim/1,6,138,16,22
klinkhamr/1,135
klokku/1,235,189,364,132,104,90,101,72
knatt/1,269,104,67
kvíggj/1,6,133
lækna/1,96,457,123,139,354,50,309,361,12,79,89,93,231
lønarviðbót/110
mans/1,111,151,344,254,429,133,294,105,75,399,224,192,12,302,137,114,228,230,295,379,371,90,297
marknaðarkreft/1,119
mat/6,6,156,174,434,285,38,92,143,206,384,141,169,279,138,360,112,318,359,278,310,36,12,79,20,49,391,226,287,385,157,89,370,383,132,120,446,297,459,101
morberja/1,103
navn/30,3,77,344,4,36,269,79,102,385,297
odda/1,156,77,92,51,107,214,36,192,20,131,60,407
ódnarvetr/1,129
plóg/1,113,198,20,447,339
posa/1,62,128,143,178,171
prekt/1,138,158
pressu/1,107
rættar/1,448,96,344,124,457,107,105,431,31,36,12,79,402,45,45,106,398,72,313,363
rang/1,19,266,75,117,410,114,263,186,211,54
rangsnúðr/1,118
rangtýdd/1,109
rannsóknar/1,4,133,123,95,89,222
reður/1,134,423,345
rist/8,8,13,130,130,6,290,11,217,280
rit/10,3,6,468,75,164,114,295,260,407,152,453,22,90
rokkafingr/1,135
rósurunn/115
rot/13,66,426,16,23,366,287,157,125,100,56
royndarvand/1,108
samvitsku/1,36,79,116,187,193,200
sand/6,331,93,124,126,81,318,85,381,97,149,22
sann/1,6,304,105,431,553,127,117,295,386
sein/1,434,304,105,322,58,104
seturs/1,161,126
sinnistvíning/1,122
sjálv/468,353,457,265,141,309,322,117,12,358,235,45,295,345,383,97,14,104,297
sjó/1,93,403,282,174,455,434,274,38,306,238,123,51,426,143,105,141,83,341,279,180,377,359,185,202,36,380,20,178,45,137,228,394,223,314,258,95,312,70,369,100,249
skaffigreið/1,121
skálabonk/120
skriðjøk/1,136
sóljukopp/140
sóttreinskingar/1,133
stjórnmála/1,139,20
stór/111,93,124,285,128,92,51,143,75,342,279,286,325,58,12,195,20,45,340,49,102,263,356,167,334,173,89,414,70,103,14,104,90,211,101,374
sveig/1,6,134,166,132
tal/30,13,3,6,124,139,354,246,444,102,258,72,311,297,114
tev/13,141,286,116,27
tor/1,19,105,456,265,112,58
ugga/1,113,92,397,36,188
undir/1,205,253,126,51,456,265,378,259,214,425,169,50,360,319,180,377,31,428,261,172,269,358,219,229,333,20,106,230,314,417,72,189,184,85,152,152,339,190,97,104
ungagás/110
úrleidd/1,109
útbygd/1,108
uttanríkisráðharra/1,107
val/10,174,174,253,168,38,457,133,107,105,16,16,359,335,154,20,114,106,102,388,209,150,173,28,398,72
vanda/1,111,253,123,202,36,45,116,345,70,100,249
var/3,6,138,16,11,12,114,116,187,193,349,158,14
vattpinn/115
viðtøku/1,304,105,81,20
vitskualdr/1,118
vøddavevnað/120
ymis/1,117,12,148
yvirván/1,26,119
